Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.031

Chapter application—Health benefit exchange.

This chapter does not apply to any position in or employee of the Washington health benefit exchange established in chapter 43.71 RCW.

[ 2012 c 87 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 87 ss 4, 16, 18, and 19-23: See note following RCW 43.71.030.

Spiritual care services—2012 c 87: See RCW 43.71.901.